Washington statutes.
RCW 43.09.188

Regulatory fairness act—Performance reviews.

The state auditor shall conduct a performance review of agency compliance with the regulatory fairness act, pursuant to chapter 19.85 RCW. The performance review must be completed no earlier than June 30, 2020, and subsequent reviews must be completed periodically thereafter. Factors used to determine the frequency of subsequent reviews include the degree to which agencies are found to be in compliance with the act. The auditor must report his or her findings to the legislature, and any recommendations, by June 30, 2021, and after every subsequent review.

[ 2017 c 53 s 4.]